Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1813
Proceedings for review; parties; rights and privileges.

In proceedings for review of an action of the commission, the commission and any jurisdictional utility which participated in the agency proceeding and could be bound by the review shall be parties to the proceedings and shall have all rights and privileges granted by the State Natural Gas Regulation Act to any other party to such proceedings.

Laws 2003, LB 790, § 13.